Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2062.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 22ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURESubchapterA. Preliminary Provisions (Reserved)B. Terms and UnitsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)SUBCHAPTER BTEAMS AND UNITSSec.123456789101112131415161718 2211. Special emergency response teams.§ 2211. Special emergency response teams.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish six response teams that consist of officers or members of the Pennsylvania State Police for the purpose of responding to incidents that require a timely and tactical response.(b) Implementation.--The commissioner shall assign one team to each of the following geographic regions which shall be delineated by the commissioner:(1) Northwest;(2) North Central;(3) Northeast;(4) Southeast;(5) Central-South Central; and(6) Southwest.(c) Duties.--The commissioner, in consultation with the commission, shall determine the scope of duties to be performed by the response teams.(d) Training.--The commissioner, in consultation with the commission, shall establish mandatory training requirements for the response teams. The training requirements shall include:(1) Safe building entry and room clearing procedures.(2) Internal team coordination and communication during tactical operations.(3) Threat identification and decision making under stress.(4) Use of cover and concealment in dynamic environments.(5) Prevention of friendly fire and crossfire incidents.(6) Scenario-based training emphasizing police officer 20250HB2062PN2646 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 safety, civilian protection and lawful use of force.(e) Selection.--The commissioner shall determine the selection process of the response teams officers or members of the Pennsylvania State Police and shall distribute the criteria to Pennsylvania State Police stationed at each of the regions under subsection (b).(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Commissioner." The Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police."Response team." A special emergency response team established under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2062PN2646 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516